Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.560

Geoduck diver safety program—Rule-making authority—Limitation on civil suit or action.

(1) By December 1, 2014, the department must, by rule, create a geoduck diver safety program and establish safety requirements for geoduck divers licensed under RCW 77.65.410. The department must adopt rules based on the recommendation of the geoduck harvest safety committee established in RCW 43.30.555.

(2) The department may adopt, amend, or repeal rules as needed to ensure the success and effectiveness of the geoduck diver safety program created under subsection (1) of this section. The department must consider the recommendations provided by the geoduck harvest safety committee under RCW 43.30.555(3).

(3) The department may not adopt rules in conflict with commercial diving safety standards and regulations promulgated and implemented by the federal occupational safety and health administration established under the federal occupational safety and health act of 1970 (84 Stat. 1590 et seq.; 29 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.).

(4) A civil suit or action may not be commenced or prosecuted against the administrator, department, or any other government officer or entity by reason of any actions taken in connection with the adoption or enforcement of the geoduck diver safety program and safety requirements established under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The state of Washington does not waive its sovereign immunity with respect to any actions taken by the department under this section.

[ 2013 c 204 s 5.]